Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3251.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Legislative body” means “legislative body” as defined in section 2001 of this title.

“Property” means real estate.

“Sewage system” means “sewage system” as defined in subdivision 3501(6) of this title.

“Special assessment” means a tax assessed against one or more properties receiving the benefit of a particular public improvement, as distinguished from a tax on the entire grand list of a municipality.

“Water system” means “water system” as defined in subdivision 3341(b)(2) of this title without reference to any determination by the water commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970.

§ 3252.
Purpose of assessments.

Special assessments may be made for the purchase, construction, repair, reconstruction, or extension of a water system or sewage system, or any other public improvement that is of benefit to a limited area of a municipality to be served by the improvement, including those projects authorized under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970; amended

2009, No. 45

, § 15i, eff. May 27, 2009.

§ 3253.
Method of apportionment.

A special assessment may be apportioned among the properties to be benefited thereby according to the listed value of such properties in the grand list, the frontage thereof, the added value accruing to each property by reason of the public improvement for which such assessment is made, or by any method other than the foregoing that results in a fair apportionment of the cost of the improvement in accordance with the benefits received.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970.

§ 3254.
Approval of voters.

A special assessment under this chapter shall be levied only by vote of a majority of the qualified voters of the municipality voting at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose.
However, the question need not be submitted to the voters if all of the owners of record of property to be assessed, or of any interest therein, other than mortgagees or lien holders, consent in writing to the assessment.
Either the vote or the consent shall include approval of the method of apportionment of the assessment.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970.

§ 3255.
Collection of assessments; liens.

Special assessments under this chapter shall constitute a lien on the property against which the assessment is made in the same manner and to the same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list of a municipality, and all procedures and remedies for the collection of taxes shall apply to special assessments.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lien for an assessment under subchapter 2 of this chapter shall be subordinate to all liens on the property in existence at the time the lien for the assessment is filed on the land records, shall be subordinate to a first mortgage on the property recorded after such filing, and shall be superior to any other lien on the property recorded after such filing. In no way shall this subsection affect the status or priority of any municipal lien other than a lien for an assessment under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970; amended

2011, No. 47

, § 18a, eff. July 1, 2012.

§ 3256.
Construction with other laws.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the financing of any of the improvements referred to in this chapter by a tax on the grand list of a municipality, or by other means.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 2, 1970.